Hawaii statutes.
[§431R-2] Retail community pharmacies;
retail pharmacy network; contractual agreements. (a) An otherwise
qualified retail community pharmacy registered to do business in this State that
requests to enter into a contractual retail pharmacy network agreement
accepting the standard terms, conditions, formularies, or requirements relating
to dispensing fees, payments, reimbursement amounts, or other pharmacy services
shall be considered part of a pharmacy benefit manager's retail pharmacy
network for purposes of a beneficiary's right to choose where to purchase
covered prescription drugs under section 431R‑3.

(b) It shall be a violation of this section
for a prescription drug benefit plan, health
benefits plan under chapter 87A, or
pharmacy benefit manager to refuse to accept an otherwise qualified retail
community pharmacy as part of a pharmacy benefit manager's retail pharmacy
network.

(c) A contractual retail pharmacy network agreement
entered into under this section shall be renewed annually, unless agreed to by
the parties. If a prescription drug benefit plan, health benefits plan under
chapter 87A, or pharmacy benefit manager who has entered into a contractual
retail pharmacy network agreement with a retail community pharmacy considers
such retail community pharmacy no longer otherwise qualified, the prescription
drug benefit plan, health benefits
plan under chapter 87A, or pharmacy
benefit manager may appeal the retail community pharmacy's qualifications with
the insurance commissioner.

(d) The insurance commissioner shall determine
the standards and requirements necessary for a retail community pharmacy to be
deemed "otherwise qualified" for purposes of this section. [L 2013, c
226, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next